Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1368.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6303(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 6303. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"General protective services report." A report asserting that a child may be at risk of harm or of harming others due to conditions or circumstances other than abuse.* * *"Valid." In relation to a general protective services report, a determination that there is substantial evidence that 123456789101112131415161718 a child:(1) i s without proper parental care or control, subsistence, education as required by law or other care or control necessary for the child's morals or physical, mental or emotional health;(2) has been placed for care or adoption in violation of law;(3) has been abandoned by or is otherwise without a parent, guardian or legal custodian;(4) is habitually and without justification truant from school;(5) is ungovernable and is at risk of harm or is creating a risk of harm to others due to habitual disregard for the reasonable and lawful commands of the child's parent, guardian or other custodian; or(6) is under 10 years of age and has committed an act designated as a crime under the laws of this Commonwealth.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1368PN1562 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819